Washington statutes.
RCW 24.46.010

Finding—Intent.

It is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of commerce provide assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2004; 1995 c 399 s 12; 1985 c 466 s 39; 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 1.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 8.]